Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201476-2303.01
Bar test survey, defined.

Bar test survey means a leakage
survey completed with a nonconductive piece of equipment made by manually
driving small holes in the ground at regular intervals along the route of
an underground gas pipe for the purpose of extracting a sample of the ground
atmosphere and testing the atmosphere in the holes with a combustible gas
detector or other suitable device.

Laws 2013, LB589, § 3.